Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2705
Administrator, defined.

Administrator means the administrator of APHIS or any employee of the United States Department of Agriculture to whom the administrator has delegated authority to act for the administrator.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 5.